Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
CHAPTER 3 Access to and Use of Public Facilities by Persons with Disabilities

Cross references.

Department of Transportation aid for transportation services for elderly and disabled persons, §

49-2-13.1

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1469, set forth a resolution as to enactment, adoption, and promulgation of ordinances and resolutions by political subdivisions “with a view towards making it as easy as possible for handicapped persons to live in a manner similar to other citizens of this state with particular emphasis on residences for handicapped citizens.”

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1255, § 1, effective July 1, 1984, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter and enacted the current chapter. The former chapter consisted of §§

30-3-1

through

30-3-1

9 and was based on Ga. L. 1972, p. 750, §§ 1, 2, and 5 through 22; Ga. L. 1977, p. 552, §§ 1, 2, and 4 through 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 10; and Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 30.

Law reviews.

For note, “Breaking the Binary:
Desegregation of Bathrooms,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 381 (2020).

30-3-1.
Purpose and intent of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter are enacted to further the policy of the State of Georgia to encourage and enable persons with disabilities or elderly persons to participate fully in the social and economic life of Georgia and to encourage and promote their education and rehabilitation. It is the intent of this chapter to eliminate, insofar as possible, unnecessary physical barriers encountered by persons with disabilities or elderly persons whose ability to participate in the social and economic life of this state is needlessly restricted when such persons cannot readily use government buildings, public buildings, and facilities used by the public.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1255, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1.

Cross references.

Selection of polling places so as to allow access to disabled voters, §

21-2-265

.

Editor’s notes.

Application, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Rules of Safety Fire Commissioner, § 120-3-20-.02.

30-3-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“ADAAG” means the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Guidelines for Buildings and Facilities issued by the United States Architectural and Transportation Barriers Compliance Board as set forth in the Federal Register.

“Adaptable” is further explained as follows:

Adaptable refers to features provided for but not actually installed. Such adaptability makes it possible for the feature required by ADAAG to be added for the occupant without major structural alteration;

Items not installed at the time of construction under the adaptable provisions of ADAAG, and items installed which might need to be removed to provide access, must be installed or removed by the owner at the owner’s expense when the dwelling is rented to a person with disabilities, within 30 days after his or her application for occupancy is approved by the owner.

“American National Standards Institute specifications (ANSI standards)” means sections 3 and 4 of the American National Standards Institute specifications A117.1-1986 for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by individuals with disabilities.

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner provided for in Chapter 2 of Title 25.

“Covered multifamily dwelling” means a building which had first occupancy after March 31, 1993, and consists of four or more units and has an elevator or the ground floor units of a building which consists of four or more units and does not have an elevator.

“Facilities” shall include, but is not limited to, walkways, sidewalks, curbings, parking lots, parks, stadiums, coliseums, and any other manmade or developed area used by the public.

“Government buildings” means all buildings, structures, streets, sidewalks, walkways, and access thereto, which are used by the public or in which persons with disabilities or elderly persons may be employed, that are constructed, leased, or renovated in whole or in part by use of state, county, or municipal funds or the funds of any political subdivisions of the state, and, to the extent not required otherwise by federal law or regulations and not beyond the power of the state to regulate, all buildings and structures used by the public which are constructed or renovated in whole or in part by use of federal funds.

“Public buildings” means all buildings, structures, streets, sidewalks, walkways, and access thereto, which are used by the public or in which persons with disabilities or elderly persons may be employed, that are constructed or renovated by the use of private funds, including rental apartment complexes of 20 units or more and temporary lodging facilities of 20 units or more, but excluding covered multifamily dwellings; provided, however, that this chapter shall require fully accessible or adaptable units in only 2 percent of the total rental apartments, or a minimum of one, whichever is greater, and this chapter shall apply to only 5 percent of the total temporary lodging units, or a minimum of one, whichever is greater; provided, further, that this chapter shall not apply to a private single-family residence or to duplexes or any complex containing fewer than 20 units, or to residential condominiums. Fifty percent of the fully accessible or adaptable rental apartment units required by this paragraph shall be adaptable for a roll-in shower stall.

“Reasonable number” for all government buildings, public buildings, and facilities receiving permits for construction or renovation after July 1, 1995, as used in Code Section 30-3-4, shall mean the minimum number as established by ADAAG.

“Reasonable number” for all government buildings, public buildings, and facilities receiving permits for construction or renovation after July 1, 1987, but before July 1, 1995, as used in Code Section 30-3-4 shall be defined for each of the following standards to mean:

“Accessible parking spaces for persons with disabilities (ANSI 4.6.1) in a reasonable number” shall be determined as follows:

Click to view

“Accessible entrances (ANSI 4.14) in a reasonable number” means that all primary entrances usually considered as major points of pedestrian flow must be accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities;

“Accessible toilet rooms, bathrooms, bathing facilities, and shower rooms (ANSI 4.22) in a reasonable number” means that for every floor which is to be made accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities at least one toilet room, bathroom, bathing facility, and shower room at a reasonable location shall conform to ANSI 4.22; and

“Accessible seating, tables, and work surfaces (ANSI 4.30) in a reasonable number” means the following:

Click to view

“Renovation” means:

If any specific component of an elevator is replaced or moved from its existing location to a different location, then the specific component shall be required to meet the ANSI A117.1 Standard, as specified in this Code section, as it applies to that specific component, including an accessible route as defined in the ANSI A117.1 Standard;

Any component of a building, structure, or facility, which is replaced, except for the purpose of repair, or moved, shall be required to meet the ANSI A117.1 Standard as specified in this Code section, including an accessible route as defined in the ANSI A117.1 Standard; or

The resurfacing, restriping, or repainting of any parking facility, whether or not such resurfacing, restriping, or repainting is required to have a permit from the appropriate political subdivision.

Total number of parking spaces Number of designated accessible parking spaces 1-400 A minimum number of 1 space or 2 percent of the total provided, whichever is greater 401 and greater 8 spaces plus 1 percent of the total provided above 401

Number of accessible Total number spaces required Up to 50 2 spaces for wheelchair users adjacent to each other 51-400 4 spaces including 2 adjacent to each other 401 and above An even number of spaces not less than 1 percent of the total number located throughout all price ranges or locations, or both

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1255, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 863, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1425, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1556, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2461, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, in paragraph (3) (now paragraph (6)) “is” was substituted for “are”.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, subparagraph (6)(F) (now paragraph (10)) was redesignated as subparagraph (6)(D) (now subparagraph (10)(D)) and “this Code section” was substituted for “Code Section 30-3-2” in subparagraphs (7)(A) and (7)(B) (now subparagraphs (11)(A) and (11)(B)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a comma was added following “structure” in subparagraph (7)(B) (now subparagraph (11)(B)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “provided” was deleted following “total provided” in the second column of the second entry in subparagraph (10)(A).

30-3-3.
Applicable standards and specifications; granting of exemptions.

All government buildings, public buildings, and facilities receiving permits for construction or renovation after July 1, 1995, shall comply with the rules and regulations adopted by the Commissioner which meet ADAAG and establish the minimum state standards for accessibility. All government buildings, public buildings, and facilities receiving permits for construction or renovation after July 1, 1984, but before July 1, 1987, shall comply with the American National Standards Institute specifications A117.1-1980 or A117.1-1986 for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by people with disabilities except as otherwise provided in paragraph (10) of Code Section 30-3-2; and all government buildings, public buildings, and facilities receiving permits for construction or renovation after July 1, 1987, but before July 1, 1995, shall comply with the American National Standards Institute specifications A117.1-1986 for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by people with disabilities except as otherwise provided in paragraph (10) or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of Code Section 30-3-2; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section is intended to require the addition of an elevator where none exists or is planned, solely for the purpose of providing an accessible route between floor levels; provided, further, that the Safety Fire Commissioner or, where applicable, the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or the local governing authority having jurisdiction over the buildings in question upon receipt of a sworn written statement from the person who owns or controls the use of any government building, public building, or facility subject to the requirements of this chapter and after taking all circumstances into consideration may determine that full compliance with any particular standard or specification set forth in this chapter is impractical, whereupon there shall be substantial compliance with the standards or specifications to the maximum extent practical and, within 45 days of such determination, a written record shall be made by the Safety Fire Commissioner or, where applicable, the board of regents or the local governing authority having jurisdiction over the buildings in question, setting forth the reasons why it is impractical for the person subject to this chapter to comply fully with the particular standard or specification and also setting forth the extent to which the government building, public building, or facility shall conform with the standard or specification. The Safety Fire Commissioner or, where applicable, the board of regents or the local governing authority having jurisdiction over the buildings in question shall be responsible for making a final determination as to whether or not an exemption shall be granted.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1255, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 30; Ga. L. 1985, p. 863, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 30; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1425, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1556, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Application, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Rules of Safety Fire Commissioner, § 120-3-20-.02.

Request for modification of specific requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Rules of Safety Fire Commissioner, § 120-3-20-.05.

Parking space designation for persons with disabilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Rules of Safety Fire Commissioner, § 120-3-20-.06.

30-3-3.1.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1, 1995, redesignated former Code Section 30-3-3.1 as present Code Section 30-3-4.

30-3-4.
Covered multifamily dwellings; building entrance on accessible route required; applicable standards and specifications.

Covered multifamily dwellings constructed for first occupancy after March 31, 1993, shall be designed and constructed to have at least one building entrance on an accessible route unless it is impractical to do so because of the terrain or unusual characteristics of the site. For purposes of this Code section, a covered multifamily dwelling shall be deemed to be designed and constructed for first occupancy on or before March 31, 1993, if it is occupied by that date or if the last building permit or renewal thereof for the covered multifamily dwellings is issued by a local government on or before January 31, 1993. The burden of establishing impracticality because of terrain or unusual site characteristics shall be in accordance with the guidelines established under the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, Public Law 100-430.

All covered multifamily dwellings constructed for first occupancy after March 31, 1993, with a building entrance on an accessible route shall be designed and constructed:

In such a manner that:

The public and common use areas are readily accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities;

All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premises are sufficiently wide to allow passage by persons with disabilities in wheelchairs; and

All premises within covered multifamily dwelling units contain the following features of adaptable design:

An accessible route into and through the covered dwelling unit;

Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmental controls in accessible locations;

Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grab bars around the toilet, tub, shower stall, and shower seat, where such facilities are provided; and

Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchair can maneuver about the space; or

To conform to the appropriate standards and requirements of Code Sections 30-3-3 and 30-3-5.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2461, § 3; Code 1981, §

30-3-4

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1, 1995, redesignated former Code Section 30-3-4 as present Code Section 30-3-5.

U.S. Code.

The reference to the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, Public Law 100-430 in this Code section is codified at

28 U.S.C. § 2341

, 2342; 42 U.S.C. §§ 3602, 3604, 3605, 3608, 3610-3614, 3614a-3616, 3617-3619.

30-3-4.1.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1, 1995, redesignated former Code Section 30-3-4.1 as present Code Section 30-3-6.

30-3-5.
Specific amenities required to be provided.

All government buildings, public buildings, and facilities receiving permits for construction or renovation after July 1, 1987, but before July 1, 1995, shall comply with the American National Standards Institute specifications A117.1-1986 for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by individuals with disabilities, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (10) and subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of Code Section 30-3-2 and except that nothing in this Code section is intended to require the addition of an elevator where none exists or is planned, solely for the purpose of providing an accessible route between floor levels and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, shall provide the following amenities for persons with disabilities, as appropriate:

Accessible parking spaces in a reasonable number of which not less than 30 percent of or a minimum of one, whichever is greater, shall have an aisle width in compliance with American National Standards Institute specifications A117.1-1986 (A4.6.2);

Accessible entrances in a reasonable number;

Accessible toilet rooms, bathrooms, bathing facilities, and shower rooms in a reasonable number; and

Accessible seating, tables, and work surfaces in a reasonable number.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1255, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 863, § 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1425, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1556, § 3; Code 1981, §

30-3-5

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1.

Cross references.

Standards for construction of curb ramps, §

32-4-94

.

Reservation of special parking places for persons with disabilities, §

40-6-220

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1, 1995, redesignated former Code Section 30-3-5 as present Code Section 30-3-7.

30-3-6.
Parking lot spaces.

In addition to any other requirement under this chapter, all parking lots for more than 40 vehicles receiving permits for construction after July 1, 1987, but before July 1, 1995, shall include at least one parking space for persons with disabilities accessible to a passenger van having an overall height not exceeding 108 inches, with additional side-loading mechanism clearance in compliance with American National Standards Institute specifications A117.1-1986 (A4.6.2); and each such parking space shall be at a grade not exceeding 2 percent and shall not require the use of an unattended fare gate mechanism which blocks access to or exit from such space unless gate-opening mechanisms are provided at a height accessible to a van driver.

Compliance with this Code section may be waived under the same conditions as provided in Code Section 30-3-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1425, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1556, § 4; Code 1981, §

30-3-6

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1, 1995, redesignated former Code Section 30-3-6 as present Code Section 30-3-8.

Parking space designation for persons with disabilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Rules of Safety Fire Commissioner, § 120-3-20-.06.

30-3-7.
Administration and enforcement of chapter.

Except for buildings under the jurisdiction of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, all buildings subject to the jurisdiction of the Safety Fire Commissioner pursuant to Code Section 25-2-12 and subsection (c) of Code Section 25-2-13 shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Safety Fire Commissioner for purposes of enforcement of this chapter.

With respect to any such building, the Safety Fire Commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:

No such building shall be built in this state by any private person or corporation or public entity unless it conforms to the requirements of Code Sections 30-3-3 and 30-3-5 and its plans and specifications have been approved by the Commissioner as provided in this subparagraph. All plans and specifications shall identify the architect or engineer who prepared them in a manner acceptable to the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall approve the plans and specifications only if they conform to the requirements of this chapter. The Commissioner shall not require any additional fee for each submission of plans or specifications other than the standard fee required by Code Section 25-2-4.1. No local governing authority shall issue any building permit for any building subject to this subsection without proof of the approval required by this subparagraph;

In any case where the Commissioner denies approval under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or an exemption under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, the rights and remedies of the person submitting the same shall be those provided by Chapter 2 of Title 33;

Upon a showing that full compliance with any particular requirement or requirements is impractical or not necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, the Commissioner may exempt a building from full compliance with the requirement or requirements and approve plans and specifications which do not conform, or which only partially conform, to the requirement or requirements.

The board of regents shall be responsible for the administration and enforcement of this chapter with respect to all buildings and facilities under its jurisdiction. No construction plans for any such building or facility shall be approved by the board of regents for any construction within the University System of Georgia unless the building or facility conforms to Code Sections 30-3-3 and 30-3-5 and unless the architect or engineer responsible for preparation of said plans and specifications affixes that person’s seal on such plans. The affixing of the seal of an architect or engineer to said plans shall constitute a certification that to the best of that person’s knowledge, information, and belief they have been prepared in conformity with Code Sections 30-3-3 and 30-3-5. A certificate of compliance may be displayed on said plans in lieu of the architect’s or engineer’s seal. The builder, developer, contractor, or building owner following said plans shall require an architect’s or engineer’s seal or a certificate of compliance to be displayed on the plans before starting construction.

Local governing authorities shall be responsible for the administration and enforcement of this chapter with regard to all government and public buildings and facilities which are not under the jurisdiction of the Safety Fire Commissioner or board of regents, pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section and which are under the jurisdiction of such local governing authorities. No building permit for any such building or facility shall be approved by any local governing authority for any private person, corporation, partnership, association, or public entity unless the plans and specifications conform to the requirements of Code Sections 30-3-3 and 30-3-5 and unless the architect or engineer responsible for preparation of said plans and specifications affixes that person’s seal on such plans. The affixing of the seal of an architect or engineer to said plans shall constitute a certification that to the best of that person’s knowledge, information, and belief they have been prepared in conformity with Code Sections 30-3-3 and 30-3-5. A certificate of compliance may be displayed on said plans in lieu of the architect’s or engineer’s seal. The builder, developer, contractor, or building owner following said plans shall require such a seal or a certificate of compliance on the plans before starting construction. All construction plans must display such a certificate of compliance, or a seal provided by the architect or engineer, for all construction in local governing jurisdictions which do not require building permits. In all areas where local governing authority building permits are not required, the builder, developer, contractor, or building owner following said plans shall require such an architect’s or engineer’s seal or a certificate of compliance to be displayed on the plans before starting construction.

In the performance of their responsibilities under this chapter, all state rehabilitation agencies and appropriate elected or appointed officials shall be required to cooperate with and assist the Safety Fire Commissioner, the board of regents, and the appropriate local building code officials or local fire department, or any combination thereof, having jurisdiction over the buildings in question.

The Safety Fire Commissioner, the board of regents, and the local building code officials or the local fire department, or any combination thereof, having jurisdiction over the buildings in question shall from time to time inform, in writing, professional organizations and others of this chapter and its application.

The Safety Fire Commissioner, the board of regents, and the local governing authority having jurisdiction over the buildings in question shall have all necessary powers to require compliance with their rules, regulations, and procedures, and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor, including powers to institute and prosecute proceedings in the superior court to compel compliance, and shall not be required to pay any entry or filing fee in connection with the institution of such proceedings.

No person, firm, or corporation shall be subject to a complaint for not complying with the provisions of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of Code Section 30-3-2 unless 90 days have passed since such person, firm, or corporation has been notified by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery of the alleged violation of the provisions of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of Code Section 30-3-2. Such notification shall include a warning of an impending complaint if the alleged violation is not corrected before the expiration of the 90 day warning period. The 90 day warning period shall not apply to any structure or facility other than parking lots nor to any part of this chapter other than subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of Code Section 30-3-2.

The Safety Fire Commissioner, the board of regents, and the local governing authority having jurisdiction over the buildings in question, after consultation with state rehabilitation agencies and other sources as they might determine, are authorized to promulgate such rules, regulations, and procedures as might reasonably be required to implement and enforce their responsibilities under this chapter. Such rules, regulations, and procedures shall not be less restrictive than those established by the Commissioner.

The Safety Fire Commissioner, the board of regents, and the local governing authority having jurisdiction over the buildings in question, after consultation with state rehabilitation agencies, are also authorized to waive any of the standards and specifications presently set forth in this chapter and to substitute in lieu thereof standards or specifications consistent in effect to such standards or specifications heretofore adopted by the American Standards Association, Inc.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1255, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 30; Ga. L. 1985, p. 863, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1556, § 5; Code 1981, §

30-3-7

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, in the second sentence of subsection (b) “Code Sections” was substituted for “Code Section”.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “subparagraph (A) of this paragraph” and “subparagraph (C) of this paragraph” were substituted for “subparagraph (2)(A) of this subsection” and “subparagraph (2)(C) of this subsection”, respectively, in subparagraph (a)(2)(B).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1, 1995, redesignated former Code Section 30-3-7 as present Code Section 30-3-9.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to paragraph (f)(2) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

30-3-8.
Penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates this chapter, or who causes another person, firm, or corporation to violate this chapter, or who fails or refuses to comply with any regulation promulgated under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1255, § 1; Code 1981, §

30-3-8

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1.

30-3-9.
Effectiveness of chapter in relation to federal law.

Any provision of this chapter which affords persons with disabilities greater access than is required by federal law shall be fully effective.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, to the extent that the provisions of this chapter are in conflict with the provisions of the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, Public Law 100-430, and the regulations and guidelines promulgated pursuant to such federal act, the provisions of such federal act and regulations and guidelines shall control; but nothing in this subsection shall operate to defeat the intention of subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-3-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2461, § 4; Code 1981, §

30-3-9

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The reference to the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, Public Law 100-430 in subsection (b) is codified at 28 U.S.C. §§ 2341, 2342; 42 U.S.C. §§ 3602, 3604, 3605, 3608, 3610—3614, 3614a—3616, 3617—3619.